Nebraska, session 109, LB494.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
estimated net receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section
77-27,158, and a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
actual net receipts for the same month of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
public statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund
net receipts and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year
as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a
comparison of the actual General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to
the actual General Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
Tax Commissioner shall determine:
(i) Actual actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such
fiscal year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and .
(ii) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year minus one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the prior fiscal year.
(b) If the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this
section is a positive number and the amount calculated in subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section is a negative number, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified
amount to the Cash Reserve Fund.
(c) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
-2-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section exceeds the amount calculated in
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer the difference between the two certified numbers to the Cash
Reserve Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount certified for
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(d) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section is less than the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax
Commissioner shall certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer such certified amount to the School District Property Tax Relief
Credit Fund.
(b) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year exceed estimated General Fund net receipts for such
fiscal year, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the excess amount to the
State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer the excess amount to
the Cash Reserve Fund, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3)(c)
of this section.
(c) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year exceed one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year, the transfer described in
subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall be modified as follows:
(i) The amount transferred to the Cash Reserve Fund shall be reduced
by the excess amount calculated under subdivision (3)(c) of this section;
and
(ii) Such excess amount shall be transferred to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
-3-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund is
created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the School District
Property Tax Relief Act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
million dollars from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26, it is the intent of the
Legislature that an amount sufficient to provide the amount of property
tax relief required by subdivision (1)(a) of section 77-7305 for each tax
year be transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that seven hundred eighty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2025-26.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred eight
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2026-27.
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred thirty-
eight million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2027-28.
(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred seventy
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2028-29.
(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that nine hundred two
-4-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2029-30.
(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount transferred
from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit
Fund in fiscal year 2030-31 and each fiscal year thereafter be equal to
the total amount transferred in the preceding fiscal year increased by
three percent.
Sec. 3. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. The property tax relief
shall be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts. The total
amount of property tax relief granted under the act shall be determined
as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year
2025, the minimum total amount of relief granted under the act shall be
seven hundred eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight
million dollars. For tax year 2027, the minimum total amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred thirty-eight million
dollars. For tax year 2028, the minimum total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be eight hundred seventy million dollars. For tax
year 2029, the minimum total amount of relief granted under the act shall
be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year
thereafter, the minimum total amount of relief granted under the act
shall be the minimum total amount of relief from the prior year,
excluding any additional relief provided pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)
of this section, with such amount then increased by three percent; and .
-5-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
(b) If money is transferred to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602, such amount shall be
added to the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section when determining the total amount of relief granted under the act
for the tax year in which the transfer occurs. If no such transfer occurs
in a given tax year, the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section shall be the total amount of relief granted under the act
for such tax year. The relief shall be in the form of property tax
credits which appear on property tax statements. Property tax credits
granted under the act shall be credited against the amount of property
taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any funds
under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the
-6-

LB494 LB494
2025 2025
Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each
school district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the
amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) The county treasurer shall disburse amounts received under
subsection (4) of this section, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 4. Original sections 77-4602, 77-7304, and 77-7305, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-